North Carolina, session 2025, HB449.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

INCREASE THE PUNISHMENT FOR COMMITTING THE OFFENSE OF
SOLICITATION OF MINORS BY COMPUTER
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 14-202.3(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) Punishment. – A violation of this section is punishable as follows:
(1) A Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, a first
violation is a Class H felony except as provided by subdivision (2) of this
subsection.E felony. A second or subsequent violation of this section, or a first
violation of this section committed when the defendant had a prior conviction
in any federal or state court in the United States that is substantially similar to
the offense set forth in this section, is a Class D felony.
(2) If either the defendant, or any other person for whom the defendant was
arranging the meeting in violation of this section, actually appears at the
meeting location, then the violation is a Class G C felony."
SECTION 1.(b) This section becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to
offenses committed on or after that date.

REQUIRE CERTAIN PETITIONS PERTAINING TO SEX OFFENDER
REGISTRATION BE PLACED ON THE CRIMINAL DOCKET
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 14-208.12B(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) The petition shall be filed in the county in which the person resides using a form
created by the Administrative Office of the Courts. The petition must be filed with the clerk of
court within 30 days of the person's receipt of the notification of the requirement to register from
the sheriff. The person filing the petition must serve a copy of the petition on the office of the
district attorney and the sheriff in the county where the person resides within three days of filing
the petition with the clerk of court. The clerk, upon receipt of the petition, shall place the petition
on the criminal docket to be calendared by the district attorney pursuant to G.S. 7A-49.4. The
petition shall be calendared at the next regularly scheduled term of superior court. At the first
*H449-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
setting, the petitioner must be advised of the right to have counsel present at the hearing and to
the appointment of counsel if the petitioner cannot afford to retain counsel. Appointment of
counsel shall be in accordance with rules adopted by the Office of Indigent Defense Services."
SECTION 2.(b) This section becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to
petitions filed on or after that date.

ESTABLISH THE OFFENSES OF HABITUAL INDECENT EXPOSURE AND
AGGRAVATED HABITUAL INDECENT EXPOSURE
SECTION 3.(a) G.S. 14-190.9 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-190.9. Indecent exposure.
…
(a6) A person commits the offense of habitual indecent exposure if that person commits a
violation of subsection (a), (a2), (a4), or (a5) of this section and has two or more prior convictions
under any combination of subsection (a), (a1), (a2), (a4), or (a5) of this section. A person
convicted of violating this subsection is guilty of a Class F felony. Additionally, the sentencing
court shall require the person to register as a sex offender pursuant to Article 27A of this Chapter.
(a7) A person commits the offense of aggravated habitual indecent exposure if that person
commits a violation of subsection (a1) of this section and has two or more prior convictions under
any combination of subsection (a), (a1), (a2), (a4), or (a5) of this section. A person convicted of
violating this subsection is guilty of a Class E felony. Additionally, the sentencing court shall
require the person to register as a sex offender pursuant to Article 27A of this Chapter.
…."
SECTION 3.(b) G.S. 14-208.6(4) reads as rewritten:
"(4) Reportable conviction. – Any of the following:
…
g. A final conviction for a violation of subsection (a6) or (a7) of
G.S. 14-190.9."

CRIMINAL SAVINGS CLAUSE AND EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 4.(a) Prosecutions for offenses committed before the effective date of
this act are not abated or affected by this act, and the statutes that would be applicable but for
this act remain applicable to those prosecutions.
SECTION 4.(b) Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 2 House Bill 449-First Edition